District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.06

Delegation and redelegation of authority.

Except as provided in § 50-921.04, the Director of DDOT is the successor to all transportation related authority delegated to the Director of the Department of Public Works and is authorized to act, either personally or through a designated representative, as a member of any committees, commissions, boards, or other bodies which presently include as a member the Director of the Department of Public Works.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 7, 49 DCR 3444
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 77(b), 52 DCR 2638
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “DDOT” for “DOT”.